Mississippi, session 2026, SB2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A felony conviction shall not disqualify an otherwise qualified elector from voting in any primary, runoff, general or special election in this state, nor shall a felony conviction disqualify an otherwise qualified candidate from running for any elected office in the State of Mississippi. (2)  Any provision of law that conflicts with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be void hereafter. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-11.  Every inhabitant of this state, except persons adjudicated to be non compos mentis, who is a citizen of the United States of America, eighteen (18) years old and upwards, who has resided in this state for thirty (30) days and for thirty (30) days in the county in which he or she seeks to vote, and for thirty (30) days in the incorporated municipality in which he or she seeks to vote, and who has been duly registered as an elector under Section 23-15-33, * * * and who has never been convicted of vote fraud or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, shall be a qualified elector in and for the county, municipality and voting precinct of his or her residence, and shall be entitled to vote at any election upon compliance with Section 23-15-563.  If the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  Any person who will be eighteen (18) years of age or older on or before the date of the general election and who is duly registered to vote not less than thirty (30) days before the primary election associated with the general election, may vote in the primary election even though the person has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday at the time that the person seeks to vote at the primary election.  No others than those specified in this section shall be entitled, or shall be allowed, to vote at any election. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, which requires that any person who has been convicted of vote fraud or any disenfranchising crime shall not be registered, or  shall be removed from the Statewide Elections Management System, is repealed. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, which calls for the circuit clerk to keep a list of individuals convicted of vote fraud or other disenfranchising crimes and have said named purged or otherwise removed by the county registrar or county election commissioners from the Statewide Elections Management System, is repealed. SECTION 5.  Section 23-15-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-153.  (1)  At least during the following times, the election commissioners shall meet at the office of the registrar or the office of the election commissioners to carefully revise the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and remove from the roll the names of all voters who have requested to be purged from the voter roll, died, received an adjudication of non compos mentis, * * * been convicted of a disenfranchising crime, failed to comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-152, or otherwise become disqualified as electors for any cause, and shall register the names of all persons who have duly applied to be registered but have been illegally denied registration: (a)  On the Tuesday after the second Monday in January 1987 and every following year; (b)  On the first Tuesday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for members of Congress in the years when members of Congress are elected; (c)  On the first Monday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for state, state district legislative, county and county district offices in the years in which those offices are elected; and (d)  On the second Monday of September preceding the general election or regular special election day in years in which a general election is not conducted. Except for the names of those voters who are duly qualified to vote in the election, no name shall be permitted to remain in the Statewide Elections Management System; however, no name shall be purged from the Statewide Elections Management System based on a change in the residence of an elector except in accordance with procedures provided for by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and as provided in Section 23-15-152.  Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-573, no person shall vote at any election whose name is not in the county voter roll electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System. (2)  Except as provided in this section, and subject to the following annual limitations, the election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section: (a)  In counties having less than fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than fifty (50) days per year, with no more than fifteen (15) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (b)  In counties having fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than seventy-five (75) days per year, with no more than twenty-five (25) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (c)  In counties having thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred (100) days per year, with no more than thirty-five (35) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year; (d)  In counties having seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred twenty-five (125) days per year, with no more than forty-five (45) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (e)  In counties having ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred fifty (150) days per year, with no more than fifty-five (55) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (f)  In counties having one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred seventy-five (175) days per year, with no more than sixty-five (65) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (g)  In counties having two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred ninety (190) days per year, with no more than seventy-five (75) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year; (h)  In counties having two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred fifteen (215) days per year, with no more than eighty-five (85) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (i)  In counties having two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred thirty (230) days per year, with no more than ninety-five (95) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (j)  In counties having two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census or more, not more than two hundred forty (240) days per year, with no more than one hundred five (105) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year. (3)  In addition to the number of days authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the board of supervisors of a county may authorize, in its discretion, the election commissioners to receive a per diem in the amount provided for in subsection (2) of this section, to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section, not to exceed five (5) days. (4)  (a)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed ten (10) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System before any special election.  For purposes of this paragraph, the regular special election day shall not be considered a special election.  The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to this paragraph. (b)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Sixty-five Dollars ($165.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for the performance of their duties on the day of any primary, runoff, general or special election; however, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the election commissioners an additional amount not to exceed Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per election.  The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply to this paragraph. (5)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed fourteen (14) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and in the conduct of a runoff election following either a general or special election. (6)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive only one (1) per diem payment for those days when the election commissioners discharge more than one (1) duty or responsibility on the same day. (7)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed five (5) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days for those days when the election commissioners shall be required to conduct an audit of an election as provided in Section 23-15-615. (8)  In preparation for a municipal primary, runoff, general or special election, the county registrar shall generate and distribute the master voter roll and pollbooks from the Statewide Elections Management System for the municipality located within the county.  The municipality shall pay the county registrar for the actual cost of preparing and printing the municipal master voter roll pollbooks.  A municipality may secure "read only" access to the Statewide Elections Management System and print its own pollbooks using this information. (9)  County election commissioners who perform the duties of an executive committee with regard to the conduct of a primary election under a written agreement authorized by law to be entered into with an executive committee shall receive per diem as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.  The days that county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of a primary election shall be treated the same as days county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of other elections. (10)  In addition to any per diem authorized by this section, any election commissioner shall be entitled to the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel on election day. (11)  Every election commissioner shall sign personally a certification setting forth the number of hours actually worked in the performance of the commissioner's official duties and for which the commissioner seeks compensation.  The certification must be on a form as prescribed in this subsection.  The commissioner's signature is, as a matter of law, made under the commissioner's oath of office and under penalties of perjury. The certification form shall be as follows: COUNTY ELECTION COMMISSIONER PER DIEM CLAIM FORM NAME: ____________________________    COUNTY:  _______________ ADDRESS: _________________________    DISTRICT:  _____________ CITY: ______________  ZIP: ________ PURPOSE  APPLICABLE  ACTUAL  PER DIEM DATE    BEGINNING  ENDING OF      MS CODE     HOURS     DAYS WORKED     TIME      TIME    WORK SECTION     WORKED  EARNED ________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ TOTAL NUMBER OF PER DIEM DAYS EARNED EXCLUDING ELECTION DAYS                        ________ PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X $110.00 TOTAL NUMBER PER DIEM DAYS EARNED FOR ELECTION DAYS                              ________ PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X $165.00 BOARD OF SUPERVISORS ELECTION DAY DISCRETIONARY ADDITION(S) TO PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X  $35.00 TOTAL AMOUNT OF PER DIEM CLAIMED $_______ I understand that I am signing this document under my oath as  an election commissioner and under penalties of perjury. I understand that I am requesting payment from taxpayer funds and that I have an obligation to be specific and truthful as to the amount of hours worked and the compensation I am requesting. Signed this the _____ day of ______________, ____. ________________________ Commissioner's Signature When properly completed and signed, the certification must be filed with the clerk of the county board of supervisors before any payment may be made.  The certification will be a public record available for inspection and reproduction immediately upon the oral or written request of any person. Any person may contest the accuracy of the certification in any respect by notifying the chair of the commission, any member of the board of supervisors or the clerk of the board of supervisors of the contest at any time before or after payment is made.  If the contest is made before payment is made, no payment shall be made as to the contested certificate until the contest is finally disposed of.  The person filing the contest shall be entitled to a full hearing, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall issue subpoenas upon request of the contestor compelling the attendance of witnesses and production of documents and things.  The contestor shall have the right to appeal de novo to the circuit court of the involved county, which appeal must be perfected within thirty (30) days from a final decision of the commission, the clerk of the board of supervisors or the board of supervisors, as the case may be. Any contestor who successfully contests any certification will be awarded all expenses incident to his or her contest, together with reasonable attorney's fees, which will be awarded upon petition to the chancery court of the involved county upon final disposition of the contest before the election commission, board of supervisors, clerk of the board of supervisors, or, in case of an appeal, final disposition by the court.  The commissioner against whom the contest is decided shall be liable for the payment of the expenses and attorney's fees, and the county shall be jointly and severally liable for same. (12)  Any election commissioner who has not received a certificate issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 23-15-211 indicating that the election commissioner has received the required elections seminar instruction and that the election commissioner is fully qualified to conduct an election, shall not receive any compensation authorized by this section or Section 23-15-239. SECTION 6.  Section 23-15-221, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-221.  (1)  The governing authorities of municipalities having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants according to the last federal decennial census shall appoint three (3) election commissioners; the governing authorities of municipalities having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants or more and less than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants according to the last federal decennial census shall appoint five (5) election commissioners; and the governing authorities of municipalities having a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more according to the last federal decennial census shall appoint seven (7) election commissioners.  The municipal election commissioners, in conjunction with the municipal clerk, shall perform all the duties in respect to the municipal election prescribed by law to be performed by the county election commissioners where not otherwise provided.  The election commissioners shall, in case there be but one (1) election precinct in the municipality, act as poll managers themselves. (2)  The city council or board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality desiring to avail itself of the provisions of the Mississippi Election Code regarding the duties of municipal election commissioners shall adopt an ordinance declaring its intention to enter into an agreement with the municipality's county to have the county election commissioners conduct municipal elections and other functions that are performed by municipal election commissioners for the benefit of the efficiency and conformity of elections, to be effective on and after a date fixed in the ordinance which must be at least thirty (30) days after the ordinance is adopted and on the first day of a month.  If the municipality is located in more than one (1) county, the municipality shall choose which county it wants to conduct its elections and other duties of its municipal election commissioners and enter into an agreement with that county to have that county's election commissioners conduct the municipal elections and other functions that are performed by municipal election commissioners for the benefit of the efficiency and conformity of elections, to be effective on and after a date fixed in the ordinance which must be at least thirty (30) days after the ordinance is adopted and on the first day of a month.  A certified copy of this ordinance shall be immediately forwarded to the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners.  The municipal authorities shall have a copy of the ordinance published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the municipality and having a general circulation therein.  The first publication shall be not less than twenty-eight (28) days before the effective date fixed in the ordinance, and the last publication shall be made not less than seven (7) days before such date.  If no newspaper is published in the municipality, then notice shall be given by publishing the ordinance for the required time in some newspaper published in the same or an adjoining county having a general circulation in the municipality.  A copy of the ordinance shall also be posted at three (3) public places in the municipality for a period of at least twenty-one (21) days during the time of its publication in a newspaper.  The publication of the ordinance may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19.  Proof of publication must also be furnished to the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners. (3)  If a city council or board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality adopts an ordinance to abolish municipal election commissioners in the municipality's county and authorize county election commissioners to conduct the municipal election commissioners' duties, the county election commissioners shall conduct all of the duties of the municipal election commissioners including, but not limited to: (a)  Canvass the results of bond elections in a municipality; (b)  Canvass the returns of special and general elections for mayor and councilmen and within five (5) days after any special or general election, deliver to each person receiving the highest number of votes a certificate of election; (c)  Certify to the Secretary of State the name or names of the person or persons elected at special and general elections within ten (10) days after any special or general election; (d)  Revise the primary pollbooks for municipalities at the time and in the manner and in accordance with the laws now fixed and in force for revising pollbooks, except they shall not remove from the pollbook any person who is qualified to participate in primary elections; (e)  Print the pollbooks that are to be used in municipal elections; (f)  Print and distribute the "official ballots"; (g)  Perform the duties of poll managers in the event there is only one (1) election precinct in the municipality; (h)  Perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to Section 23-15-239 if the municipal executive committee has entered into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal or county election commission that gives such authorization; (i)  Determine whether each party candidate in the municipal general election is a qualified elector of the municipality, and of the ward if the office sought is a ward office, whether each candidate either meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office * * *, and whether any candidate has been convicted of any felony in a court of this state, or has been convicted on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, or has been convicted of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992; (j)  Declare each candidate elected without opposition, if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office as determined pursuant to a review by the commission in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection (3); (k)  Canvass the returns for municipal elections received from all voting precincts and within ten (10) days after the election, deliver to each person receiving the highest number of votes a certificate of election.  If it shall appear that any two (2) or more of the candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall have received an equal number of votes, the election shall be decided by the toss of a coin or by lot, fairly and publicly drawn by the election commissioners; (l)  Transmit the statement provided in Section 23-15-611 to the Secretary of State certifying the name or names of the person or persons elected at municipal elections, and such person or persons shall be issued commissions by the Governor; (m)  Receiving the filed document by any person desiring to contest the qualifications of another person who has qualified pursuant to the provisions of Section 23-15-361 as a candidate for municipal office elected on the date designated by law for regular municipal elections that specifically sets forth the grounds of the challenge no later than thirty-one (31) days after the date of the first primary election set forth in Section 23-15-309; and (n)  Perform all other duties with respect to the municipal election prescribed by law. (4)  If the city council or board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality does not desire to avail itself of the provisions of the Mississippi Election Code regarding the duties of municipal election commissioners, then nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to affect, alter or modify the existence of those municipal election commissioners now operating under the laws relating to municipal election commissioners provided in the Mississippi Code of 1972. Those municipalities shall continue to enjoy the form of election commissions and the conduct of the respective elections that are now enjoyed by them, and each shall possess all rights, powers, privileges and immunities granted and conferred under the laws relating to municipal election commissioners provided in the Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 7.  Section 23-15-299, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-299.  (1)  (a) Assessments made pursuant to subsection (1)(a), (b), (c) and (d) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (b)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (3)(a), (b) and (c) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (2)  (a)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (1)(e) and (f) of Section 23-15-297, shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the circuit clerk of that candidate's county of residence by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.  The circuit clerk shall forward the fee and all necessary information to the secretary of the proper county executive committee within two (2) business days.  No candidate may attempt to qualify with any political party that does not have a duly organized county executive committee, and the circuit clerk shall not accept any assessments paid for nonlegislative offices pursuant to subsection (1)(e) and (f) of Section 23-15-297 if the circuit clerk does not have contact information for the secretary of the county executive committee for that political party. (b)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (3)(d) and (e) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the circuit clerk of that candidate's county of residence by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.  The circuit clerk shall forward the fee and all necessary information to the secretary of the proper county election commission within two (2) business days. (3)  (a)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (1)(g) and (h) of Section 23-15-297 must be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary; however, no such assessments may be paid before December 1 of the year before the primary election for the office is held.  If seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary in years in which a congressional preference primary occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (b)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (3)(f) and (g) of Section 23-15-297 must be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary in years in which a congressional preference primary is held; however, no such assessments may be paid before December 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (4)  (a)  The fees paid pursuant to subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall be accompanied by an affidavit under penalty of perjury containing the name, physical address of the candidate's residence, the party with which he or she is affiliated, if applicable, the candidate's phone number, the email address of the candidate, if any, and the office for which he or she is a candidate.  Such affidavit shall require the candidate to certify that he or she meets all qualifications for the office for which he or she is a candidate. (b)  The state executive committee shall transmit to the Secretary of State a copy of the written statements and required documents accompanying the fees paid pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section.  All copies must be received by the Office of the Secretary of State by not later than 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline; provided, however, the failure of the Office of the Secretary of State to receive such copies by 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline shall not affect the qualification of a person who pays the required fee and files the required statement and the required documents by 5:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline.  The Secretary of State shall assess a Five Hundred Dollar ($500.00) fine to any state executive committee that fails to transmit any written statements and other required documents and accompanying fees to the Secretary of State by 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline.  Such fine shall be assessed for each written statement and other required documents and fees that were not turned in to the Office of the Secretary of State by 6:00 p.m.; however, in no case shall the total fines assessed to a state executive committee exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for a particular qualifying deadline.  The Secretary of State shall deposit any fines received from any state executive committee into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5.  The name of any person who pays the required fee and files the required statement and documents after 5:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline shall not be placed on the primary election ballot or the general election ballot. (5)  The Secretary of State or the secretary or circuit clerk to whom such payments are made shall promptly receipt for same stating the office for which the candidate making payment is running and the political party with which he or she is affiliated, if applicable, and he or she shall keep an itemized account in detail showing the exact time and date of the receipt of each payment received by him or her and, where applicable, the date of the postmark on the envelope containing the fee and from whom, and for what office the party paying same is a candidate. (6)  The secretaries of the proper executive committee shall hold the funds to be finally disposed of by order of their respective executive committees.  The funds may be used or disbursed by the executive committee receiving same to pay all necessary traveling or other necessary expenses of the members of the executive committee incurred in discharging their duties as committee members, and of their secretary and may pay the secretary such salary as may be reasonable.  The Secretary of State shall deposit any qualifying fees received from candidates into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5. (7)  (a)  Upon receipt of the proper fee and all necessary information, the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall then determine the following: (i)  Whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the state, state district, county or county district which they seek to serve; and (ii)  Whether each candidate meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office; and (iii)  Whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election; and * * *   (iv)  Whether any candidate has been convicted of any of the following and not pardoned: 1. Any felony in a court of this state, 2. On or after December 8, 1992, any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, 3. Any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992, or 4. Any offense that involved the misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office.  Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state; and ( * * *viv)  Whether the candidate has voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction in which he or she seeks to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction.  If a candidate is found to have voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction that he or she seeks to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction, the name of such candidate shall not appear on the ballot.  However, if a candidate who votes in an election that he or she was properly registered for is then subsequently redistricted into the jurisdiction that he or she is currently seeking to represent, then he or she shall not be disqualified as a candidate due to voting in an election outside of his or her current jurisdiction during the required residency period. (b)  The proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall make the determinations in paragraph (a) of this subsection within the following time periods: (i)  Five (5) days of the qualifying deadline during presidential preference primary elections; or (ii)  Fifteen (15) days of the qualifying deadline for federal mid-term elections; or (iii)  Thirty (30) days of the qualifying deadline during statewide elections. If the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, finds that a candidate either (i) is not a qualified elector, or (ii) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, * * * or (iii) has been convicted of a felony or other disqualifying offense as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and not pardoned, then the executive committee shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard.  The executive committee shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms.  If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove that he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of that candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot. (c)  If the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken. (d)  Where there is but one (1) candidate for each office contested at the primary election, the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, when the time has expired within which the names of candidates shall be furnished shall declare such candidates the nominees. (8)  No candidate may qualify by filing the information required by this section by using the internet. SECTION 8.  Section 23-15-309, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-309.  (1)  Nominations for all municipal officers which are elective shall be made at a primary election, or elections, to be held in the manner prescribed by law.  All persons desiring to be candidates for the nomination in the primary elections shall first pay Ten Dollars ($10.00) to the clerk of the municipality, at least sixty (60) days before the first primary election, no later than 5:00 p.m. on such deadline day.  If the sixtieth day to file the fee and written statement before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the fees and written statements submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted. (2)  The fee paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be accompanied by a written statement containing the name and address of the candidate, the party with which he or she is affiliated, the email address of the candidate, if any, and the office for which he or she is a candidate. (3)  The clerk shall promptly receipt the payment, stating the office for which the person making the payment is running and the political party with which such person is affiliated.  The clerk shall keep an itemized account in detail showing the time and date of the receipt of such payment received by him or her, from whom such payment was received, the party with which such person is affiliated and for what office the person paying the fee is a candidate.  No candidate may attempt to qualify with any political party that does not have a duly organized municipal executive committee, and the municipal clerk shall not accept any assessments made pursuant to subsection (1) if the municipal clerk does not have contact information for the secretary of the municipal executive committee for that political party.  The clerk shall promptly supply all necessary information and pay over all fees so received to the secretary of the proper municipal executive committee.  The funds may be used and disbursed in the same manner as is allowed in Section 23-15-299 in regard to other executive committees. (4)  Upon receipt of the above information, the proper municipal executive committee shall then determine, at the time of the qualifying deadline, whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the municipality, and of the ward if the office sought is a ward office, shall determine whether each candidate either meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office.  The executive committee shall determine whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election. * * *  The committee also shall determine whether any candidate has been convicted of any felony in a court of this state, or has been convicted on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, or has been convicted of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992.  Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state unless such offense also involved misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office.  If the proper municipal executive committee finds that a candidate either * * * (a) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, * * * or (b) has been convicted of a felony as described in this subsection and not pardoned, then the executive committee shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard.  The executive committee shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms.  If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of such candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot.  If the executive committee determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken. (5)  Where there is but one (1) candidate, the proper municipal executive committee when the time has expired within which the names of candidates shall be furnished shall declare such candidate the nominee. SECTION 9.  Section 23-15-359, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-359.  (1)  Except as provided in this section, the ballot shall contain the names of all party nominees certified by the appropriate executive committee, and independent and special election candidates who have timely filed petitions containing the required signatures and assessments that must be paid pursuant to Section 23-15-297, if the candidates and nominees meet all of the qualifications to hold the office sought.  A petition requesting that an independent or special election candidate's name be placed on the ballot for any office shall be filed as provided for in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, as appropriate, and shall be signed by not less than the following number of qualified electors: (a)  For an office elected by the state at large, not less than one thousand (1,000) qualified electors. (b)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a Supreme Court district, not less than three hundred (300) qualified electors. (c)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a congressional district, not less than two hundred (200) qualified electors. (d)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a circuit or chancery court district, not less than one hundred (100) qualified electors. (e)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a senatorial or representative district, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors. (f)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a county, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors. (g)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a supervisors district, not less than fifteen (15) qualified electors. (h)  For the Office of President of the United States, a party nominee or independent candidate shall pay an assessment in the amount of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00). (2)  (a)  Unless the petition or fee, whichever is applicable, required above shall be filed as provided for in subsection (3), (4) or (5) of this section, as appropriate, the name of the person requested to be a candidate, unless nominated by a political party, shall not be placed upon the ballot.  The ballot shall contain the names of each candidate for each office, and the names shall be listed under the name of the political party that candidate represents as provided by law and as certified to the circuit clerk by the state executive committee of the political party.  In the event the candidate qualifies as an independent as provided in this section, he or she shall be listed on the ballot as an independent candidate. (b)  The name of an independent or special election candidate who dies before the printing of the ballots, shall not be placed on the ballots. (3)  Petitions for offices described in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) of subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State,  by no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date or business day, as applicable, by which candidates are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-297; and, no petition may be filed before the date specified in Section 23-15-299. (4)  Petitions for offices described in paragraphs (f) and (g) of subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the proper circuit clerk, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, by no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date by which candidates are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-297; however, no petition may be filed before January 1 of the year in which the election for the office is held.  The circuit clerk shall notify the county election commissioners of all persons who have filed petitions with the clerk.  The notification shall occur within two (2) business days and shall contain all necessary information. (5)  A petition required under this section, or any other petition for a special election, shall be accompanied by a statement, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, containing the name and physical address of the candidate, the email address of the candidate, if any, and the office he or she seeks.  Each statement shall also require the candidate to certify that he or she meets all the qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks. (6)  The assessment for the office described in paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of this section shall be paid to the Secretary of State.  The Secretary of State shall deposit any qualifying fees received from candidates into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5. (7)  The election commissioners may also have printed upon the ballot any local issue election matter that is authorized to be held on the same date as the regular or general election pursuant to Section 23-15-375; however, the ballot form of the local issue must be filed with the election commissioners by the appropriate governing authority not less than sixty (60) days before the date of the election. (8)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to municipal elections or to the election of the offices of justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, chancellor, county court judge, justice court judge and family court judge. (9)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit special elections to fill vacancies in either house of the Legislature from being held as provided in Section 23-15-851.  In all elections conducted under the provisions of Section 23-15-851, there shall be printed on the ballot the name of any candidate who, not having been nominated by a political party, shall have been requested to be a candidate for any office by a petition filed with the Secretary of State and signed by not less than fifty (50) qualified electors. (10)  (a)  The appropriate election commission shall determine the following: (i)  Whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the state, state district, county or county district they seek to serve; and (ii)  Whether each candidate meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office; and (iii)  Whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election; and * * *   (iv)  Whether any candidate has been convicted of any of the following: 1. Any felony in a court of this state, 2. On or after December 8, 1992, any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, 3. Any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992, or 4. Any offense that involved the misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office.  Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state; and ( * * *viv)  Whether the candidate has voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction in which he or she seeks to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction.  If a candidate is found to have voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction that he or she seeks to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction, the name of such candidate shall not appear on the ballot.  However, if a candidate who votes in an election that he or she was properly registered for is then subsequently redistricted into the jurisdiction that he or she is currently seeking to represent, then he or she shall not be disqualified as a candidate due to voting in an election outside of his or her current jurisdiction during the required residency period. (b)  If the appropriate election commission finds that a candidate either (i) is not a qualified elector, (ii) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, * * * or (iii) has been convicted of a felony or other disqualifying offense as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and not pardoned, or ( * * *iviii) has voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction he or she is currently seeking to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction, and is not subject to a redistricting exception as stated in paragraph (a)(v) of this subsection, then the election commission shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard.  The election commission shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms.  If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove that he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of such candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot.  If the appropriate election commission determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken.  The election commission shall render a decision on whether the name of the candidate shall appear on the ballot within five (5) days of the hearing. (c)  (i)  A candidate aggrieved by the decision of the appropriate election commission may file a petition for judicial review to the circuit court of the county in which the election commission whose decision is being reviewed sits.  Such petition must be filed no later than ten (10) days after the decision of the election commission.  Such candidate filing for judicial review shall give a cost bond in the sum of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) with two (2) or more sufficient sureties conditioned to pay all costs in case his or her petition be dismissed, and an additional bond may be required, by the court, if necessary, at any subsequent stage of the proceedings. (ii)  The circuit court with whom such a petition for judicial review has been filed shall at the earliest possible date set the matter for hearing.  Notice shall be given to the interested parties of the time set for hearing by the circuit clerk.  The hearing before the circuit court shall be de novo.  The matter shall be tried to the circuit judge, without a jury.  After hearing the evidence, the circuit judge shall determine whether the candidate whose qualifications have been challenged is legally qualified to have his or her name placed upon the ballot in question.  The circuit judge may, upon disqualification of any such candidate, order that such candidate shall bear the court costs of the proceedings. (iii)  Within three (3) days after judgment is rendered by the circuit court, the contestant or contestee, or both, may file an appeal in the Supreme Court upon giving a cost bond in the sum of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), together with a bill of exceptions that states the point or points of law at issue with a sufficient synopsis of the facts to fully disclose the bearing and relevancy of such points of law.  The bill of exceptions shall be signed by the trial judge, or in case of his or her absence, refusal or disability, by two (2) disinterested attorneys, as is provided by law in other cases of bills of exception.  The filing of such appeals shall automatically suspend the decision of the circuit court and the appropriate election officials are entitled to proceed based upon their decision unless the Supreme Court, in its discretion, stays further proceedings in the matter.  The appeal shall be immediately docketed in the Supreme Court and referred to the court en banc upon briefs without oral argument unless the court shall call for oral argument, and shall be decided at the earliest possible date, as a preference case over all others.  The Supreme Court shall have the authority to grant such relief as is appropriate under the circumstances. (iv)  The procedure set forth above shall be the sole and only manner in which a candidate may appeal the appropriate election commission's decision to not place the candidate's name on the ballot under this section.  These provisions do not interfere with the rights of other persons to challenge the decision of the appropriate election commission to place the name of the candidate on the ballot in accordance with Section 23-15-963.  After any person assumes an elective office, his or her qualifications to hold that office may be contested as otherwise provided by law. (11)  If after the deadline to qualify as a candidate for an office or after the time for holding any party primary for an office, only one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for the office in the general election, the name of that person shall be placed on the ballot; provided, however, that if not more than one (1) person duly qualified to be a candidate for each office on the general election ballot, the election for all offices on the ballot shall be dispensed with and the appropriate election commission shall declare each candidate elected without opposition if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office as determined pursuant to a review by the election commission in accordance with the provisions of subsection (9) of this section and if the candidate has filed all required campaign finance disclosure reports as required by Section 23-15-807. (12)  The documents required by this section may not be filed by using the internet. SECTION 10.  Section 23-15-361, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-361.  (1)  The municipal general election ballot shall contain the names of all candidates who have been put in nomination by the municipal primary election of any political party.  There shall be printed on the ballots the names of all persons so nominated, whether the nomination be otherwise known or not, upon the written request of one or more of the candidates so nominated, or of any qualified elector who will make oath that he or she was a participant in the primary election, and that the person whose name is presented by him or her was nominated by such primary election.  The municipal election commissioners who are required to have the ballots printed, shall also have printed on the ballot in any municipal general election the name of any candidate who, not having been nominated by a political party, shall have been requested to be a candidate for any office by a petition filed with the clerk of the municipality no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date by which candidates for nomination in the municipal primary elections are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-309, and signed by not less than the following number of qualified electors: (a)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a municipality or a municipal district having a population of one thousand (1,000) or more, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors. (b)  For an office elected by the qualified electors of a municipality or a municipal district having a population of less than one thousand (1,000), not less than fifteen (15) qualified electors. (2)  Unless the petition required above shall be filed no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date by which candidates for nomination in the municipal primary election are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-309, the name of the person requested to be a candidate, unless nominated by a political party, shall not be placed upon the ballot.  The ballot shall contain the names of each candidate for each municipal office, and the names shall be listed under the name of the political party the candidate represents as provided by law and as certified to the municipal clerk by the municipal executive committee of such political party. In the event such candidate qualifies as an independent as herein provided, he or she shall be listed on the ballot as an independent candidate. (3)  The clerk of the municipality shall notify the municipal election commissioners of all persons who have filed petitions pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within two (2) business days of the date of filing. (4)  The ballot in elections to fill vacancies in municipal elective office shall contain the names of all persons who have qualified as required by Section 23-15-857. (5)  The municipal election commission shall determine whether each party candidate in the municipal general election is a qualified elector of the municipality, and of the ward if the office sought is a ward office and shall determine whether each candidate either meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office. * * *  The municipal election commission also shall determine whether any candidate has been convicted of any felony in a court of this state, or has been convicted on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, or has been convicted of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992. Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state unless such offense also involved misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office.  If the municipal election commission finds that a candidate either (a) is not a qualified elector * * *, or (b) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, * * * or (c) has been convicted of a felony as described above and not pardoned, then the election commission shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard.  The election commission shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms. If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of the candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot. (6)  If after the deadline to qualify as a candidate for an office or after the time for holding any party primary election for an office, only one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for the office in the general election the name of that person shall be placed on the ballot; provided, however, that if not more than one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for each office on the general election ballot, the election for all offices on the ballot shall be dispensed with and the municipal election commission shall declare each candidate elected without opposition if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office as determined pursuant to a review by the election commission in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and if the candidate has filed all required campaign finance disclosure reports as required by Section 23-15-807. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after the date Senate Concurrent Resolution No. ___, 2026 Regular Session, proposing an amendment to Section 241 and a repeal of Section 44 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, is approved by the voters.